Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 6
BUILDING AND FIRE REGULATIONS

31-15-601. Building and fire regulations - emission performance standards required - reporting.

The governing bodies of municipalities have the following powers in relation to building and fire regulations:

To regulate the construction, repairs, and use of vaults, cisterns, areas, hydrants, pumps, sewers, and gutters;

To regulate partition fences and party walls;

To prescribe the thickness and strength of, and the manner of constructing, stone, brick, and other buildings and to prescribe the construction of fire escapes therein;

To prescribe the limits within which wooden buildings shall not be erected, or moved into from outside said limits or placed in or repaired without permission, to direct that any buildings within the fire limits, when the same have been damaged by fire, decay, or otherwise to the extent of fifty percent of the value, be torn down or removed, and to prescribe the manner of ascertaining such damage;

To prevent the dangerous construction and condition of chimneys, fireplaces, hearths, stoves, stovepipes, ovens, and apparatus used in and about any factory and to cause the same to be removed or placed in a safe condition when considered dangerous;

To regulate and prevent the carrying on of manufacturing which causes and promotes fires;

To prevent the deposit of ashes in unsafe places and to cause all such buildings and enclosures as may be in a dangerous state to be put in a safe condition;

To provide for the inspection of steam boilers;

To compel the owners and occupants of houses and other buildings to have scuttles on the roof and stairs or ladders leading to the same and to compel the owners of all buildings over two stories in height to provide fire escapes;

To regulate the size, number, and manner of the construction of the doors and stairways of theaters, tenement houses, audience rooms, and all buildings used for the gathering of a large number of people, to provide convenient, safe, and speedy exits in case of fire;

To compel the owners of all lots with a building fronting on the street to provide a number on said building;

To regulate or prevent the storage and transportation of gunpowder, tar, pitch, resin, coal oil, benzine, turpentine, hemp, cotton, gasoline, nitroglycerine, petroleum, or any of the products thereof, and other combustible or explosive material within the municipal limits and to prescribe the limits within which any such regulations shall apply; to regulate the use of lights in garages, shops, and other places; to regulate or prevent the storage of gunpowder and other high explosives within the municipal limits or within one mile of the outer boundaries thereof; and to regulate and restrain the use of fireworks, firecrackers, torpedoes, roman candles, skyrockets, and other pyrotechnic displays;

To regulate fires consistent with the provisions of section 31-15-401 (1)(q);

To regulate and prohibit the keeping of any lumberyard and the placing, piling, or selling of any lumber, timber, wood, or other combustible material within the fire limits of the municipality and to regulate the storage of any combustible material at any place within the limits of the municipality;

To erect engine houses and provide fire engines, hose, hose carts, hooks and ladders, and other implements for the extinguishing of fires and provide for the use and management of the same by volunteer fire companies or otherwise; to determine the powers and duties of the members of the fire department in taking charge of property to the extent necessary to bring under control and extinguish any fire; to preserve and protect property not destroyed by fire; and to restrain persons from interfering with the discharge of the duties of the members of the fire department in connection with the fighting of any fire;

To adopt an ordinance to authorize, in consultation with the local board of health, local public health agencies, and any water and wastewater service providers serving the municipality, the use of graywater, as defined in section 25-8-103 (8.3), C.R.S., in compliance with any regulation adopted pursuant to section 25-8-205 (1)(g), C.R.S., and to enforce compliance with the governing body's ordinance.

Before adopting an ordinance to authorize the use of graywater pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (m), the municipal governing body is encouraged to enter into a memorandum of understanding with the local board of health, local public health agencies, and any water and wastewater service providers serving the municipality concerning graywater usage and the proper installation and operation of graywater treatment works, as defined in section 25-8-103 (8.4), C.R.S.

By the date established in section 25-7-407, C.R.S., every governing body of a municipality which has enacted a building code, and thereafter every governing body which enacts a building code, shall enact a building code provision to regulate the construction and installation of fireplaces in order to minimize emission levels. Such building code provision shall contain standards which shall be the same as or stricter than the approved emission performance standards for fireplaces established by the air quality control commission in the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 25-7-407, C.R.S.

By January 1, 2020, every governing body of a municipality which has enacted a building code and an energy code shall report the current version of their municipality's building and energy codes to the Colorado energy office. Thereafter, every governing body of a municipality is encouraged to report any change in their municipality's building and energy code to the Colorado energy office within a month of changing their municipality's building and energy codes.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1111, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(2) added, p. 782, § 3, effective April 12.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 1144, § 9, effective June 16.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 2802, § 564, effective July 1.

L. 2002, 3rd Ex. Sess.:

(1)(j) amended and (1)(j.5) added, p. 38, § 5, effective July 17.

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 774, § 59, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(m) added, (HB 13-1044), ch. 228, p. 1089, § 5, effective May 15.

L. 2019:

(3) added, (HB 19-1260), ch. 357, p. 3285, § 3, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act adding subsection (1)(m), see section 1 of chapter 228, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

31-15-602. Energy efficient building codes - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that there is statewide interest in requiring an effective energy efficient building code for the following reasons:

Excessive energy consumption creates effects beyond the boundaries of the local government within which the energy is consumed because the production of power occurs in centralized locations.

Air pollutant emissions from energy consumption affects the health of the citizens throughout Colorado.

The strain on the grid from peak electric power demands is not confined to jurisdictional boundaries.

There is statewide interest in the reliability of the electrical grid and an adequate supply of heating oil and natural gas.

Controlling energy costs for residents and businesses furthers a statewide interest in a strong economy and reducing the cost of housing in Colorado.

More recent energy codes are more effective at ensuring building durability and structural integrity and protecting public health and safety through better:

Moisture management to prevent mold, mildew, and rot;

Airflow management; and

Protection during severe weather.

More recent energy codes incorporate newer building technologies, techniques, and materials and offer more options for builders.

Businesses and residents in low-income communities and rural areas of the state deserve at least the same durability, health and safety, and energy cost savings from energy efficient buildings as those in wealthier, urban, and suburban areas of the state.

Highly energy efficient homes and buildings can reduce energy use and help consumers save money on energy bills.

Highly energy efficient and low carbon new homes and buildings are critical for meeting the greenhouse gas pollution reduction targets established in section 25-7-102 (2)(g).

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Building code" means regulations related to energy performance, electrical systems, mechanical systems, plumbing systems, or other elements of residential or commercial buildings.

"Energy code" means a subset of building codes related to the total energy performance and carbon emissions of residential and commercial buildings.

"International energy conservation code" means the energy code published by the international code council or a successor organization.

"Office" means the Colorado energy office created in section 24-38.5-101, C.R.S.

The governing body of any municipality that has adopted and enforced one or more building codes, or that adopts and enforces one or more building codes after July 1, 2022, shall adopt and enforce an energy code that applies to the construction of, and major renovations and additions to, all commercial and residential buildings as required by the energy code in the municipality to which the building code applies.

(3.5) (a) The governing body of a municipality that has adopted and enforced one or more building codes, and that updates one or more building codes on or after July 1, 2023, and before July 1, 2026, shall adopt and enforce an energy code that achieves equivalent or better energy performance than the 2021 international energy conservation code and the model electric ready and solar ready code language developed for adoption by the energy code board pursuant to section 24-38.5-401 (5) at the same time other building codes are updated.

The governing body of a municipality that has adopted and enforced one or more building codes, and that updates one or more building codes on or after July 1, 2026, shall adopt and begin enforcing an energy code that achieves equivalent or better energy and carbon emissions performance than the model low energy and carbon code language developed for adoption by the energy code board pursuant to section 24-38.5-401 (6) at the same time other building codes are updated.

When adopting or updating a building code prior to July 1, 2023, the governing body of a municipality shall adopt and enforce an energy code that achieves equivalent or better energy performance than one of the three most recent editions of the international energy conservation code.

Repealed.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the aggregate of all charges or other related or associated fees a municipality shall impose or assess to install an active solar electric or solar thermal device or system or a geothermal energy system shall not exceed the lesser of the municipality's actual costs in issuing the permit or five hundred dollars for a residential application or one thousand dollars for a nonresidential application if the device or system produces fewer than two megawatts of direct current electricity or an equivalent-sized thermal energy system, or that exceed the municipality's actual costs in issuing the permit if the device or system produces at least two megawatts of direct current electricity or an equivalent-sized thermal energy system. A municipality may increase its fees or other charges as authorized by this subsection (4)(b)(I) by no more than five percent on an annual basis until the five hundred dollar limitation specified in this subsection (4)(b)(I) is achieved. The municipality shall clearly and individually identify all fees and taxes assessed on an application subject to this subsection (4)(b)(I) on the invoice. The general assembly hereby finds that there is a statewide need for certainty regarding the fees that can be assessed for permitting such devices or systems, and therefore declares that this subsection (4)(b) is a matter of statewide concern.
(b) (I) (A) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the aggregate of all charges or other related or associated fees a municipality shall impose or assess to install an active solar electric or solar thermal device or system or a geothermal energy system shall not exceed the lesser of the municipality's actual costs in issuing the permit or five hundred dollars for a residential application or one thousand dollars for a nonresidential application if the device or system produces fewer than two megawatts of direct current electricity or an equivalent-sized thermal energy system, or that exceed the municipality's actual costs in issuing the permit if the device or system produces at least two megawatts of direct current electricity or an equivalent-sized thermal energy system. A municipality may increase its fees or other charges as authorized by this subsection (4)(b)(I) by no more than five percent on an annual basis until the five hundred dollar limitation specified in this subsection (4)(b)(I) is achieved. The municipality shall clearly and individually identify all fees and taxes assessed on an application subject to this subsection (4)(b)(I) on the invoice. The general assembly hereby finds that there is a statewide need for certainty regarding the fees that can be assessed for permitting such devices or systems, and therefore declares that this subsection (4)(b) is a matter of statewide concern.

In the case of a nonresidential application, on an individual installation basis only, if the municipality incurs actual costs for issuing the permit that are greater than one thousand dollars, the municipality is entitled to recovery of its actual costs for issuing the permit by submitting in writing and disclosing to the applicant for the particular permit proof of the municipality's actual costs.

As used in this subsection (4)(b)(I), "active solar energy system" means a single system that contains electric generation, a thermal device, or is an energy storage system as defined in section 40-2-202 (2), and "geothermal energy system" means a system that uses geothermal energy for water heating or space heating or cooling in a single building, for space heating for more than one building through a pipeline network, or for electricity generation.

This subsection (4)(b) is repealed, effective December 31, 2029.

The following buildings are exempt from subsections (3), (3.5), and (4) of this section:

Any building that is otherwise exempt from the provisions of the building code adopted by the governing body of the municipality in which the building is located and buildings that do not contain a conditioned space;

Any building that does not use either electricity or fossil fuels for comfort heating. A building will be presumed to be heated by electricity even in the absence of equipment used for electric comfort heating if the building is provided with electrical service in excess of one hundred amps, unless the code enforcement official of the municipality determines that the electrical service is necessary for a purpose other than for providing electric comfort heating.

Historic buildings that are listed on the national register of historic places or Colorado state register of historic properties and buildings that have been designated as historically significant or that have been deemed eligible for designation by a local governing body that is authorized to make such designations; and

Any building that is exempt pursuant to the energy code.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the governing body of any municipality that is required to adopt an energy code may make any amendments to the energy code that the governing body deems appropriate for local conditions, so long as the amendments do not decrease the effectiveness of the energy code.

The office shall ensure that information explaining the requirements of the energy code and describing acceptable methods of compliance is available to builders, designers, engineers, and architects.

The office shall provide the governing body of any municipality with technical assistance concerning the implementation and enforcement of the energy code.

Nothing in this section restricts the ability of an investor-owned utility with approval from the public utilities commission to:

Provide incentives or other energy efficiency program services to help the governing body of any municipality or builders comply with the requirements of this section; or

Earn shareholder incentives and claim credits towards its regulatory requirements for energy or greenhouse gas emission savings achieved as a result of incentives provided by the utility to help the governing body of any municipality or builders comply with the requirements of this section.

A utility not subject to regulation by the public utilities commission may provide incentives or other energy efficiency program services as they so choose to assist the governing body of any municipality or any builders in complying with the requirements of this section.

A utility may count mass-based emissions reductions associated with the requirements of this section towards compliance with its requirements under section 25-7-105 (1)(e)(X.7) or (1)(e)(X.8), section 40-3.2-108 (3)(b), or any similar greenhouse gas emissions reduction program or set of requirements.

A utility subject to regulation by the public utilities commission shall not count energy savings or greenhouse gas emissions reductions achieved through the requirements of this section for the purpose of calculating a shareholder incentive established pursuant to sections 40-3.2-103 (2)(d) and 40-3.2-104 (5) if the utility has not provided a financial investment for code adoption as documented in a plan approved by the commission.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 697, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2)(b) and (2)(c) amended, p. 72, § 11, effective March 18; (4) amended, p. 893, § 2, effective May 20.

L. 2011:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 11-1199), ch. 311, p. 1519, § 3, effective June 10.

L. 2012:

(2)(b) and (2)(c) amended, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 975, § 38, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(4)(b) amended, (SB 17-179), ch. 170, p. 622, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(1)(f), (1)(g), and (1)(h) added and (2)(b), (3), and IP(5) amended, (HB 19-1260), ch. 357, p. 3286, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 21-1284), ch. 327, p. 2091, § 4, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(1)(i), (1)(j), (2)(b.5), (3.5), (8), (9), and (10) added, (2)(b), (3), and IP(5) amended, and (4)(a) repealed, (HB 22-1362), ch. 301, p. 2186, § 8, effective June 2; (4)(b)(I)(A) and (4)(b)(I)(C) amended, (SB 22-118), ch. 335, p. 2372, § 8, effective August 10.

Cross references:

(1) In 2011, subsection (4)(b) was amended by the "Fair Permit Act". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 311, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1284, see section 1 of chapter 327, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.